Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1130.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2132. (1) An insurer that issues a home insurance policy shall offer a fortified roof endorsement to upgrade a property otherwise eligible for a fortified standard to the fortified roof or successor standard as provided in chapter 29A if the property incurs damage covered by the policy requiring the roof to be replaced. (2) The endorsement must upgrade the property consistent with the fortified requirements for the geographic area in which the property is located. (3) If an insured has purchased the fortified roof endorsement offered under subsection (1), and replacement of the roof is required as a direct result of a tornado, hail, or other catastrophic windstorm event that is otherwise covered by the policy, the insurer shall, subject to the terms, conditions, limitations, and exclusions of the policy and endorsement, cover the reasonable additional cost of replacing the roof to a fortified roof standard. (4) The endorsement offer must be for any homeowner policy issued or renewed after December 31, 2027. (5) An insurer subject to subsection (1) shall file with the department the insurer's endorsement forms and accompanying rates for prior approval by the department by April 1, 2027. (6) As used in this section: (a) "Fortified" means the trademark symbol owned by the Insurance Institute for Business and Home Safety. (b) "Fortified roof" means the trademark owned by the Insurance Institute for Business and Home Safety. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. ____ (request no. H07605'26). (b) House Bill No. ____ (request no. H07606'26).